Illinois, session 104th, SB3155.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Invest in Illinois Act is amended by adding 5Section 51 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 751/51 new)7    Sec. 51. Countries of concern. 8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no award 9of economic incentives may be made under this Act to an entity 10if (i) the entity is organized under the laws of or has its 11principal place of business in a foreign country of concern or 12(ii) the government of a foreign country of concern has a 13controlling interest in the entity.14    (b) As used in this Section: 15    "Controlling interest" means possession of the power to 16direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of 17a company, whether through ownership of securities, by 18contract, or otherwise. A person or entity that directly or 19indirectly has the right to vote 25% or more of the voting 20interests of the company or is entitled to 25% or more of the 21company's profits is presumed to possess a controlling 22interest. 23    "Foreign country of concern" means the People's Republic   SB3155- 2 -LRB104 19268 HLH 32714 b1of China, the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of 2Iran, the Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the Republic 3of Cuba, Venezuela, or the Syrian Arab Republic, including any 4agency of or any other entity of significant control of such 5foreign country of concern.